Utah statutes.
40-2-201.   Utah Office of Coal Mine Safety created.

(1)  There is created within the commission the "Utah Office of Coal Mine Safety."

(2)  The office, under the direction of the commissioner, shall assist the commission in administering this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 113, 2008 General Session

